Florida, session 2026, HB1133.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 409.9746, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
409.9746 Early periodic screening, diagnostic, and
treatment services; pediatric behavioral and mental health
screenings.—
(1) The agency shall adopt rules establishing practice
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1133-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1133 2026
parameters and protocols, and requiring managed care plans to
provide services consistent with such practice parameters and
protocols, including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(a) The use of validated, age-appropriate, trauma-informed
diagnostic tools based on nationally recognized clinical
practice guidelines to provide early periodic screening,
diagnostic, and treatment services to participants from birth
through 21 years of age.
(b) Authorizing a health care provider to use mobile
response teams, community mental health centers, behavioral
health hubs, and other qualified health care providers for
consultation, support with medication management, and
introduction of the patient to another health care provider as a
referral.
(c) Encouraging parents or legal guardians to participate
in mental health programs that provide education and support,
including, but not limited to, general parenting skills or more
specialized programs that offer education and support for more
specific behavioral or mental health issues.
(d) Requiring health care providers to give parents or
legal guardians information created by the Department of Health
about sleep, screen time, and nutrition. The department shall
develop such information and make it available for download by
health care providers.
(2) By January 1, 2027, the agency shall adopt performance
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1133-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1133 2026
measures related to early periodic screening, diagnostic, and
treatment services and establish outcome data reporting
requirements. The agency shall use the measures as a tool to
monitor plan performance in connection with other measures
required pursuant to this part. Beginning January 1, 2028, the
agency shall submit an annual report on the performance measures
and outcome data to the Governor, the President of the Senate,
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1133-00